Georgia, session 2025_26, HB706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
"Quality Basic Education Act," is amended in Part 2, relating to competencies and core
curriculum, by revising subsections (c) and (e) Code Section 20-2-142.1, relating to
coursework in the founding philosophy and principles of the United States of America, as
follows:
"(c) Each local board of education may require all students, as a condition of graduation,
during their ninth through twelfth grade years to complete and pass a separate semester
course covering the following founding philosophy and principles of the United States of
America:
H. B. 706
- 1 -

LC 49 2312
(1) America's founding philosophy, to include at least the following:
(A) As articulated in the Declaration of Independence the foundational idea of the
Creator-endowed Creator endowed unalienable rights of the people;
(B) The purpose of limited government, which is to protect the unalienable rights of
the people and to protect the people from violence and fraud;
(C) The structure of government, separation of powers, and checks and balances; and
(D) The rule of law, with frequent and free elections in a representative government
which governs by majority vote within a constitutional framework;
(2) America's founding principles, to include at least the following:
(A) Federalism-government as close to the people as possible, limited federal
government, and strong state and local government;
(B) Freedoms of speech, press, religion, and peaceful assembly guaranteed by the Bill
of Rights;
(C) Rights to private property and freedom of individual enterprise;
(D) The innocence of any crime until proven guilty, with right of habeas corpus, and
no unreasonable searches, seizures, or cruel and unusual punishment;
(E) A virtuous and moral people educated in the philosophy and principles of
government for a free people;
(F) The right to a speedy trial by a jury of peers;
(G) The principles of economy in spending, constitutional limitations on government
power to tax and spend, and prompt payment of public debt;
(H) Economic system of money with intrinsic value;
(I) Equality before the law and due process of law with grand jury indictment for
capital crimes before holding a person to account;
(J) The right of people to keep and bear arms, strong defense capability, supremacy of
civil authority over military;
H. B. 706
- 2 -

LC 49 2312
(K) Peace, commerce, and honest friendship with all nations, entangling alliances with
none;
(L) All laws concise and understandable by the people and not ex post facto laws;
(M) Eternal vigilance by 'We the People'; and
(N) Founding documents, including the Declaration of Independence, the United States
Constitution, and the Federalist Papers; and
(3) Transformational movements in American history, to include at least the following:
(A) The antislavery movement;
(B) The Civil Rights movement;
(C) Women's suffrage;
(D) The contributions of immigrants to American society; and
(E) The history of the Native American population; and
(F) The history of Black Americans, including both the struggles and the triumphs of
Black Americans throughout the history of the United States and the contributions of
Black Americans to American society."
"(e) This Code section shall apply beginning in school year 2017-2018 2025-2026."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Part 14, relating to other educational programs, by revising
Code Section 20-2-308, which is reserved, as follows:
"20-2-308.
Each local education agency, as such term is defined in Code Section 20-2-167.1, shall
require each school it operates to conduct educational programs and activities equal to at
least one class period addressing the history of Black Americans, including both the
struggles and the triumphs of Black Americans throughout the history of the United States
and the contributions of Black Americans to American society. Schools are encouraged
H. B. 706
- 3 -

LC 49 2312
to focus educational programs and activities on the topics provided for in this Code section
during the month of February. Reserved."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 706
- 4 -